Maine, session 132, LD1287.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA c. 201, sub-c. 3-D is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 3-D
HOUSING STABILITY SUPPORT
§4768. Housing Stability Support Program
The Housing Stability Support Program, referred to in this subchapter as "the
program," is established within the Maine State Housing Authority.
1. Program. The program provides assistance to prevent eviction of renters with
household incomes of less than 30% of the median income for the area as defined by the
United States Department of Housing and Urban Development under the United States
Housing Act of 1937, Public Law 75-412, 50 Stat. 888, Section 8, as amended.
2. Administration. The Maine State Housing Authority shall delegate administration
of the program and provide appropriate funding to one or more of the following: a
designated community action agency as described by Title 22, section 5324; a municipal
housing authority; or any other qualified entity as determined by the Maine State Housing
Authority, including but not limited to a community-based organization. An entity
delegated to administer the program must demonstrate experience as an administrator of
similar programs and have the ability to provide job-seeking assistance to renters who
benefit from the program. An entity delegated to administer the program shall develop a
method of verifying a person's eligibility for rental assistance every 6 months after initial
approval. An entity delegated to administer the program shall limit administrative costs to
10% or less of an allocation received from the fund and keep the total cost of program
delivery and administrative costs to 25% or less of an allocation received from the fund.
Page 1 - 132LR1976(06)

3. Program delivery and operations. The program must include funding and
capacity for adequate staffing to support program delivery and operations, facilitate
wraparound and navigation services and provide essential stability and case management
critical to the success of program participants. An entity delegated to administer the
program must be capable of serving a diverse population, including persons with limited
proficiency in the English language and from a wide range of cultural backgrounds, and
must possess demonstrated experience administering similar programs, including
supplemental rental assistance and housing navigation programs. Staff members must
substantially participate in ensuring equitable access and program compliance and in
connecting renters with broader supports that promote long-term housing stability and
workforce participation.
4. Form and amount of assistance. Assistance provided under the program is limited
to $3,000 per household per calendar year. Assistance must be paid directly to the program
participant's landlord in an amount not to exceed $300 per month, except when the
assistance payment is for a security deposit required for a new lease or rental agreement.
5. Eligibility. A person eligible for assistance under the program must:
A. At the time of application, earn less than 30% of the median income for the area as
defined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development under
the United States Housing Act of 1937, Public Law 75-412, 50 Stat. 888, Section 8, as
amended;
B. At the time of application, not be using a federal housing voucher to pay rent or live
in a subsidized housing unit;
C. Provide proof of a current landlord-tenant relationship, such as a lease or other
documentation sufficient to demonstrate a landlord-tenant relationship, to an entity
delegated to administer the program; and
D. Have a rental payment within the standard rental payment amount as determined by
the housing authority of jurisdiction.
§4769. Housing Stability Fund
1. Establishment. The Housing Stability Fund, referred to in this subchapter as "the
fund," is established within the Maine State Housing Authority for the purpose of
supporting the program.
2. Sources of fund. The fund may receive money from any available state, federal or
private source. The fund may not lapse but must be carried forward to carry out the
purposes of this subchapter.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §4641-B, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 559, Pt. I, §4 and
affected by §15, is amended to read:
3. Disposition of funds. Each register of deeds shall, on or before the 10th day of
each month, pay over to the State Tax Assessor 90% of the tax collected pursuant to this
section during the previous month. The remaining 10% must be retained for the county by
the register of deeds and accounted for to the county treasurer as reimbursement for services
rendered by the county in collecting the tax, except that, for fiscal years 2025-26 and 2026-
27, each register of deeds shall, on or before the 10th day of each month, pay over to the
State Tax Assessor 90.8% of the tax collected pursuant to this section during the previous
Page 2 - 132LR1976(06)

month. The remaining 9.2% must be retained for the county by the register of deeds and
accounted for to the county treasurer as reimbursement for services rendered by the county
in collecting the tax. If the tax collected is not paid over by the 10th day of the month, the
State Tax Assessor may impose interest pursuant to section 186.
Sec. 3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
Housing Stability Fund N517
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the Housing Stability Support Program to provide
support for eviction prevention.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,000,000 $1,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,000,000 $1,000,000
Housing Stability Fund N517
Initiative: Provides a base allocation for use if outside funds are received from private
sources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $1,000,000 $1,000,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $500 $500
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $1,000,500 $1,000,500
Page 3 - 132LR1976(06)